Vermont, session 2025-2026, H191.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #380474 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.191
2025 Page 2 of 6
(1) The population of inmates in Vermont has risen from approximately
300 detainees per day in 2020 to approximately 500 detainees per day in 2024
while the sentenced population has remained relatively stable during the same
time period.
(2) Housing individuals in an out-of-state correctional facility is not a
temporary solution and results in a long-term costly and unsustainable practice
for the State.
(3) Sending individuals out of state discourages visits from family and
friends. Studies have shown a correlation between visitation and reduced
recidivism upon completion of prison time.
(4) Incarcerated individuals housed out of state have restricted access to
legal counsel, resulting in an increased reliance on telecommunication. This
additional burden subjects prisoners and those who wish to contact them to
exorbitant correctional facility phone rates.
(5) The State is unable to provide the same level of oversight and care
for incarcerated individuals held at out-of-state correctional facilities.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that, by 2034, Vermont’s
practice of housing incarcerated individuals in privately operated, for-profit, or
out-of-state correctional facilities shall be prohibited so that corporations are
not enriched for depriving the liberty of persons sentenced to imprisonment. It
is the further intent of the General Assembly that such a prohibition does not
VT LEG #380474 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.191
2025 Page 3 of 6
affect incarcerated individuals housed in a facility pursuant to an interstate
compact.
Sec. 2. 28 V.S.A. § 102 is amended to read:
§ 102. COMMISSIONER OF CORRECTIONS; APPOINTMENT;
POWERS; RESPONSIBILITIES
* * *
(b) The Commissioner is charged with the following powers:
* * *
(4) To appoint and remove subordinate officers of the Department in
accordance with law, and, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute
or law, to delegate any authority conferred on him or her the Commissioner by
statute to any designee named by him or her the Commissioner in writing.
(5) To order the assignment and transfer of persons committed to the
custody of the Commissioner to correctional facilities provided the facilities
are operated by a public or nonprofit entity, including out-of-state facilities.
* * *
(c) The Commissioner is charged with the following responsibilities:
* * *
(11) To close any correctional facility that he or she the Commissioner
deems inadequate.
VT LEG #380474 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.191
2025 Page 4 of 6
(12) To establish training programs for new employees and to establish
such in-service training programs as he or she the Commissioner deems
advisable.
* * *
(17) To exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
in carrying out his or her the Commissioner’s responsibilities and in fulfilling
the purposes and objectives of this title.
* * *
(20) To utilize the Department of Buildings and General Services’
competitive bidding practices in order to determine the most effective and cost-
effective alternatives for housing inmates placed in any out-of-state
correctional facility pursuant to an interstate compact or federal contract.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 709 is added to read:
§ 709. OUT-OF-STATE FACILITIES; PROHIBITIONS
(a) Facility prohibitions.
(1) No individual under the custody of the Commissioner shall be
supervised, housed, treated, or cared for in an out-of-state correctional facility
unless it is operated by a public or nonprofit entity to house individuals
pursuant to an interstate compact or federal contract.
(2) The Department shall not employ any rehabilitative, educational,
health care, or other support services provided by a private or for-profit entity.
VT LEG #380474 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.191
2025 Page 5 of 6
(3) The Department shall not contract with any private or for-profit
entity to operate any correctional facility.
(b) Transfer prohibitions.
(1) On and after July 1, 2025, the Commissioner shall neither negotiate
nor execute contracts for the assignment or transfer of individuals to an out-of-
state correctional facility unless the facility is operated by a public or nonprofit
entity to house individuals pursuant to an interstate compact or federal
contract.
(2) On and after January 1, 2030, the Commissioner shall terminate or
amend any existing contracts to be compliant with this section.
Sec. 4. OUT-OF-STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES; PROHIBITION;
IMPLEMENTATION PLAN
On or before November 15, 2025, the Department of Corrections shall
develop and submit a written report to the Senate Committees on Institutions
and on Judiciary and the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions
detailing an implementation plan for the following:
(1) the expansion of in-state capacity for facilities operated by the
Department of Corrections, with the objective of leveraging restorative justice
approaches, pre- and post-charge diversion, and rehabilitative programming to
achieve such capacity expansion; and
VT LEG #380474 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.191
2025 Page 6 of 6
(2) transferring individuals currently housed in out-of-state facilities
back to Vermont in accordance with the timelines described in 28 V.S.A.
§ 709(b).
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380474 v.1